dev/apertium-urd.urd.dix
    <pardef n="پھ/ینکنا__vblex_caus1">
      <e><p>          <l>نکانا</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکانا</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکانے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکانے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="inf"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکاؤں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکاؤں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکاؤں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکاؤں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="fam"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکا</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکا</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکا</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکا</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="cas"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائیے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائیے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائیے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائیے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائیے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکاؤ</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائیے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائیے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائیے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pol"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائیں</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="dst"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>نکائے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ینکائے</l><r>ینکنا<s n="vblex"/><s n="caus1"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="prx"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

    <e lm="پھینکنا"><i>پھ</i><par n="پھ/ینکنا__vblex_caus1"/></e>
